ko: 음식물 처리기 투입 방식: 뚜껑 작동식; 연속 공급; 기타
fi: Jäteastian syöttötyyppi: Syöttö erissä; Jatkuva syöttö; Muu
zh-CN: 垃圾处理器进料类型: 批量进料式; 连续进料; 其他
nl: Type invoer voor afvalverwerking: Batchtoever; Continue toevoer; Overig
tr: Çöp öğütücü besleme tipi: Toplu beslemeli; Sürekli besleme; Diğer
zh-TW: 廚餘處理機進料類型: 批次進料; 連續式進料; 其他
fr: Système de chargement des déchets dans le broyeur d’évier: Alimentation par lots; Alimentation continue; Autre
th: ประเภทการป้อนเครื่องกำจัดขยะ: ฟีดแบบแบตช์; แบบทำงานต่อเนื่อง; อื่นๆ
sv: Typ av avfallshantering: Batchmatning; Kontinuerlig matning; Övrigt
da: Indføringstype for affaldskværn: Indføring med større mængde; Kontinuerlig tilførsel; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de alimentação para triturador de lixo: Acionamento por lote; Alimentação contínua; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta dovoda za odlaganje smeti: Serijsko podajanje; Neprekinjeno dovajanje; Druga
nb: Type innmating for kjøkkenavfallskvern: Partiforing; Kontinuerlig mating; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta dovoda za drobilicu smeća: Skupni otvor; Kontinuirano punjenje; Ostalo
hu: Szemétlerakó adagolási típusa: Tömeges adagolás; Folyamatos adagolás; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul de alimentare a tocătorului de deșeuri: Alimentare în loturi; Alimentare continuă; Altele
el: Τύπος τροφοδοσίας τεμαχιστή απορριμμάτων: Τμηματικής τροφοδοσίας; Συνεχής τροφοδοσία; Άλλο
de: Zuführungstyp des Abfallzerkleinerers: Stückweiser Betrieb; Kontinuierliche Zuführung; Sonstiges
ru: Тип загрузки измельчителя отходов: Порционная загрузка; Непрерывная подача; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de alimentação para triturador de lixo: Alimentação por lotes; Alimentação contínua; Outro
ja: 生ごみ処理機の投入タイプ: バッチフィード; 連続フィード; その他
it: Tipo di alimentazione per lo smaltimento dei rifiuti: Alimentazione a carico intermittente; Alimentazione continua; Altro
en: Garbage disposal feed type: Batch feed; Continuous feed; Other
vi: Loại nạp của máy xử lý rác thải: Cấp theo lô; Nạp liên tục; Khác
es: Tipo de carga del triturador de desechos: Triturador; Alimentación continua; Otros
pl: Typ podajnika do utylizacji odpadów: Z podajnikiem wsadowym; Podawanie ciągłe; Pozostałe
lt-LT: Maisto atliekų smulkintuvo padavimo tipas: Pakopinis padavimas; Nuolatinis tiekimas; Kita
bg-BG: Тип подаване при кухненска мелачка за отпадъци: Пакетно подаване; Непрекъснато подаване; Друго
sk-SK: Typ privádzania odpadu: Podávanie po dávkach; Nepretržité podávanie; Iné
cs: Způsob podávání odpadu: Dávkový drtič; Průběžné plnění; Jiné